Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 50TH ANNIVERSARY OF VIETNAM WAR AND SOUTHEAST ASIAN CONFLICT.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for the joint commemoration program for the 50th anniversary of the Vietnam War/Secret War in Laos/Southeast Asian Conflict, as provided in Laws 2024, chapter 106, article 4, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (k). new text end